Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB71.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4905(d) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4905. Safety requirements for towed vehicles.* * *(d) Safety chains and cables.--Whenever two vehicles are connected by a ball-and-socket type hitch, or pintle hook without a locking device, they shall also be connected by two safety chains or safety cables of equal length, each safety chain or safety cable having an ultimate strength at least equal to the gross weight of the towed vehicles. The safety chains or safety cables shall be crossed and connected to the towed and towing vehicle and to the tow bar so as to prevent the tow bar from dropping to the ground in the event the tow bar fails or 123456789101112131415161718 becomes disconnected. The safety chains or safety cables shall have no more slack than is necessary to permit proper turning.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0071PN0059 - 2 - 1234